Utah statutes.
11-17-12.   Bonds -- Eligibility as investments and for use as security.

Bonds issued under this act are hereby made securities in which all public officers and public bodies of the state and its political subdivisions, all insurance companies, credit unions, building and loan associations, trust companies, banking associations, investment companies, executors, administrators, trustees and other fiduciaries, pension, profit-sharing and retirement funds may properly and legally invest funds, including capital in their control or belonging to them.  Such bonds are hereby made securities which may properly and legally be deposited with and received by any state or municipal officer or any agency or political subdivision of the state for any purpose for which the deposit of bonds or obligations of the state is now or may hereafter be authorized by law.



Enacted by Chapter 29, 1967 General Session

